Florida, session 2026, SB264.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 35 36 Section 1.â(1)âThe Fish and Wildlife Conservation 37 Commission shall develop and conduct a survey of this stateâs 38 youth to determine whether the state should select another bird 39 species as the official state bird. 40 (2)âThe Fish and Wildlife Conservation Commission shall 41 provide the survey to the participants in the Florida Youth 42 Conservation Centers Network summer camps during the summers of 43 2026 and 2027. The survey must include the northern mockingbird, 44 American osprey, Florida scrub jay, American flamingo, and 45 American white ibis as selections. In addition to the survey, 46 the commission shall provide the participants with the 47 information available on the commissionâs publicly available 48 website related to such birds. 49 (3)âNo later than December 31, 2027, the commission shall 50 submit the results of the survey to the President of the Senate 51 and the Speaker of the House of Representatives. 52 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect upon becoming a law.